Utah statutes.
26-25-3.   Information considered privileged communications.

All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other data furnished by reason of this chapter, and any findings or conclusions resulting from those studies are privileged communications and are not subject to discovery, use, or receipt in evidence in any legal proceeding of any kind or character.



Amended by Chapter 201, 1996 General Session

